fr: Type de sourdine pour instrument à cordes d'orchestre: Concert/Représentation; Pratique intensive; Orchestre (standard); Entraînement/Hôtel; Autre
sk-SK: Typ tlmenia orchestrálnych sláčikových nástrojov: Koncert/Vystúpenie; Intenzívne cvičenie; Orchestrálne (štandardné); Cvičenie/Hotel; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de surdina para instrumento de cordas orquestral: Concerto/apresentação; Estudo pesado; Orquestral (padrão); Estudo/hotel; Outros
ja: オーケストラ弦楽器ミュートタイプ: コンサート/演奏用; ヘビープラクティス用; オーケストラ (標準); 練習/ホテル用; その他
vi: Loại giảm thanh của nhạc cụ dây giao hưởng: Hòa nhạc/Biểu diễn; Tập luyện chuyên sâu; Nhạc giao hưởng (tiêu chuẩn); Tập luyện/Khách sạn; Khác
es: Tipo de sordina para instrumentos de cuerdas de orquesta: Concierto/Presentación; Práctica intensa; Orquestal (estándar); Práctica/Hotel; Otro
ru: Тип сурдины оркестровых струнных инструментов: Концертная; Глухая (для занятий); Оркестровая (стандартная); Для занятий/отельная; Другое
lt-LT: Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų surdinų tipas: Koncertinė / pasirodymų; Sunkioji treniruočių; Orkestrinė (standartinė); Treniruočių / viešbučio; Kita
fi: Orkesterin jousisoitinten vaimennustyyppi: Konsertti/esitys; Raskas harjoittelu; Orkesteri (vakio); Harjoittelu/hotelli; Muu
ro-RO: Tip de surdină pentru instrumente cu corzi orchestrale: Concert/Interpretare; Studiu intens; Orchestră (standard); Studiu/Hotel; Altele
en: Orchestral string instrument mute type: Concert/Performance; Heavy practice; Orchestral (standard); Practice/Hotel; Other
nl: Type demper voor orkeststrijkinstrumenten: Concert/optreden; Zwaar (oefenen); Orkestraal (standaard); Oefenen/hotel; Overige
hr-HR: Vrsta prigušivača orkestralnog gudačkog instrumenta: Koncert/izvedba; Intenzivno vježbanje; Orkestralno (standardno); Vježbanje/hotel; Ostalo
da: Dæmpertype til orkesterstrengeinstrument: Koncert/optræden; Kraftig øvedæmper; Orkester (standard); Øvning/hotel; Andet
cs: Typ tlumiče pro smyčcové orchestrální nástroje: Koncertní; Těžké cvičné; Orchestrální (standardní); Cvičné/hotelové; Ostatní
de: Dämpfer für Streichinstrumente: Konzert/Aufführung; Schwerer Übungsdämpfer; Orchester (Standard); Übung/Hotel; Sonstige
sv: Typ av dämpare för orkesterstränginstrument: Konsert/framträdande; Tung övningssordin; Orkester (standard); Övning/hotell; Övrigt
zh-CN: 管弦乐器弱音器类型: 音乐会/演出用; 强力弱音（练习用）; 管弦乐（标准）; 练习/酒店用; 其他
it: Tipo di sordina per strumenti ad arco: Concerto/esibizione; Da studio pesante; Orchestrale (standard); Da studio/hotel; Altro
tr: Orkestra yaylı çalgı susturucu tipi: Konser/Performans; Yoğun egzersiz; Orkestra (standart); Egzersiz/Otel; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de surdina para instrumentos de cordas de orquestra: Concerto/atuação; Prática intensa; Orquestral (padrão); Prática/hotel; Outro
hu: Zenekari húros hangszer szordínó típusa: Koncert/fellépés; Intenzív gyakorló; Zenekari (standard); Gyakorló/hotel; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta dušilca za orkestrske strunske instrumente: Koncertno/za nastop; Za intenzivno vadbo; Orkestrsko (standardno); Za vadbo/hotelsko; Drugo
pl: Typ tłumika instrumentu smyczkowego orkiestrowego: Koncertowy; Ciężki (do ćwiczeń); Orkiestrowy (standardowy); Do ćwiczeń/hotelowy; Inne
el: Τύπος σιγαστήρα για ορχηστρικό έγχορδο όργανο: Συναυλία/Παράσταση; Σκληρή εξάσκηση; Ορχηστρικό (τυπικό); Εξάσκηση/Ξενοδοχείο; Άλλο
nb: Dempetype for orkesterstrengeinstrumenter: Konsert/opptreden; Kraftig øving; Orkester (standard); Øving/hotell; Annet
ko: 오케스트라 현악기 뮤트 유형: 콘서트/공연용; 헤비 프랙티스용; 오케스트라(표준); 연습/호텔용; 기타
th: ประเภทของอุปกรณ์ลดเสียงสำหรับเครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา: คอนเสิร์ต/การแสดง; ซ้อมหนัก; ออร์เคสตรา (มาตรฐาน); ซ้อม/โรงแรม; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип заглушител за оркестров струнен инструмент: Концерт/Изпълнение; Репетиционна (тежка); Оркестрова (стандартна); Репетиция/Хотел; Друго
zh-TW: 管弦樂器弱音器類型: 音樂會/表演; 強效練習用; 管弦樂用 (標準); 練習/飯店用; 其他